South Dakota, session 2026, HB1054.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 1-26D-5 be AMENDED:
1-26D-5. The chief hearing examiner shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter
1-26, for the operation of the Office of Hearing Examiners and for the procedures to be
used with regard to hearing contested cases.
Section 2. That § 1-33-38 be AMENDED:
1-33-38. The head of the Bureau of Information and Telecommunications is the
commissioner of information and telecommunications.
The bureau is administered by the commissioner, who shall:
(1) Provide assistance, under the rules and regulations provided in this section, as
necessary for the performance of the official duties imposed upon the various
departments and divisions by this code;
(2) Employ staff and maintain facilities as necessary to operate a local government
services program that arranges or provides services for public corporations
pursuant to § 1-33-45;
(3) Create a telecommunications network that:
(a) Provides cost effective services for business, education, government, and
rural economic development; and
(b) Ensures network uses are consistent with the best interests of the state and
telecommunications network users; and
(4) Administer policies and promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, related to the
management, programming, and use of the state information network.

26.671.10 2 1054
Section 3. That § 1-33-26 be REPEALED.
Section 4. That § 1-33-30 be REPEALED.
Section 5. That § 1-33-32 be REPEALED.
Section 6. That § 1-33-35 be REPEALED.
Section 7. That § 1-33-36 be REPEALED.
Section 8. That § 1-33-59 be REPEALED.
HB1054 ENROLLED

26.671.10 3 1054
An Act to repeal the creation and budgeting for the Digital Dakota Network.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1054
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1054 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1054 ENROLLED